Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-806
Holding companies; when unlawful.

No corporation, joint-stock company, limited liability company, or other association shall engage in business within this state, a majority of whose stock is owned by or controlled or held in trust for any manufacturing or other corporation, which, in the course of its manufacture or production, conducts its business, or any part thereof, in a manner which would be prohibited by sections 59-801 to 59-831 if it were so conducted in the course of such business within this state.

Laws 1905, c. 162, § 7, p. 639;

R.S.1913, § 4051;

C.S.1922, § 3454;

C.S.1929, § 59-807;

R.S.1943, § 59-806;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 361;

Laws 2002, LB 1278, § 1.